test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_eellid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Verb - eelliđ: # MLO, checked
    eelliđ+V+Inf: eelliđ
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iälám
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: iäláh
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iälá # CSH
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: elleen
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: elivettee # CSH
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: eelliv
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: eellip
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: elivetteđ # CSH
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: eelih # CSH
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: eellim
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: eellih
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: eelij
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: eelijm # No diff between du1 and pl1
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: eelijd # No diff between du2 and pl2
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: eelijn
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: eelijm
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: eelijd
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ellii

    eelliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: iäláččim
    eelliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: iäláččih
    eelliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: iäláččij
    eelliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: iäláččáim
    eelliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: iäláččáid
    eelliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: iäláččáin
    eelliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: iäláččijm
    eelliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: iäláččijd
    eelliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: iäláččii

    eelliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: elleem
    eelliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: elleeh
    eelliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: eeliš
    eelliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: eližeen
    eelliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: eelišvettee
    eelliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: eližává
    eelliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: eližep
    eelliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: eelišvetteđ
    eelliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: eližeh
    eelliđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ele
    eelliđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: iälus
    eelliđ+V+Imprt+Du1: iälloon
    eelliđ+V+Imprt+Du2: ellee
    eelliđ+V+Imprt+Du3: iällus
    eelliđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: iällup
    eelliđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: eelliđ
    eelliđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: iällus
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ele
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: iällám

    eelliđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: iälláá
    eelliđ+V+PrsPrc: ellee
    eelliđ+V+PrfPrc: iällám
    eelliđ+V+Actio+Nom: eellim
    eelliđ+V+Actio+Ess: elimin
    eelliđ+V+Actio+Loc: elimist
    eelliđ+V+Actio+Ill: elimân
